Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-103
City council; members; number; qualifications.

The city council of a city of the second class shall consist of not less than four nor more than twelve residents of the city who are registered voters.

Laws 1879, § 3, p. 194;

R.S.1913, § 4995;

C.S.1922, § 4164;

C.S.1929, § 17-103;

R.S.1943, § 17-103;

Laws 1973, LB 559, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 489.